Maryland, session 2025, SB0839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
19–102.
This title applies only in Dorchester County.
19–1306.
(a) There is a beer [and], wine, AND LIQUOR tasting [(BWT)] (BWLT) license.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Board may issue the
license to a holder of a Class A license to hold tastings of beer [or], wine, OR LIQUOR.
(2) [The holder of a Class A beer license may use the license to hold tastings
of beer only] A LICENSE HOLDER MAY NOT HOLD TASTINGS OF ANY ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGES THAT THE LICENSE HOLDER IS NOT AUTHORIZED TO SELL UNDER THE
HOLDER’S CLASS A LICENSE.
– 1 –

Ch. 829 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) The license authorizes the holder to allow the consumption of beer [or], wine,
OR LIQUOR for tasting if:
(1) the consumer is not charged for the beer [or], wine, OR LIQUOR; and
(2) the beer [or], wine, OR LIQUOR is consumed on the premises of the
holder of the Class A license.
(d) (1) An applicant for the license shall submit to the Board an application on
a form that the Board provides.
(2) The Board may not require the publication of a license application
before issuing the license.
(3) The Board may issue the license without a public hearing.
(4) If an initial license application is denied:
(i) the applicant may resubmit the application; and
(ii) on request from the applicant, the Board shall hold a public
hearing on the license application before determining whether to issue the license.
(5) The license holder shall notify the Board in writing at least 7 days
before the event at which the license is to be used.
(6) Renewal of the license may be made when the holder’s Class A license
is renewed.
(e) An individual may consume beer [or], wine, OR LIQUOR covered by the
license in a quantity of not more than:
(1) (i) 3 ounces from each offering of beer; and
(ii) 8 ounces from all offerings of beer in 1 day; [and]
(2) (i) 1 ounce from each offering of wine; and
(ii) 4 ounces from all offerings of wine in 1 day; AND
(3) (I) 0.5 OUNCES FROM EACH OFFERING OF LIQUOR; AND
(II) 1.5 OUNCES FROM ALL OFFERINGS OF LIQUOR IN 1 DAY.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 829
(f) At the end of the day for which the license is valid, the license holder shall
properly dispose of beer [or], wine, OR LIQUOR that remains in a container that was
opened for tasting.
(g) The license fee is:
(1) $150 for not more than 15 beer [or], wine, OR LIQUOR tastings per
year; or
(2) $250 for not more than 30 beer [or], wine, OR LIQUOR tastings per
year.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –